from-class.masc.lexc
Multichar_Symbols d͡ʒ t͡ʃ

LEXICON Masc

əkeʎ #;
siβil #;
ʃop #;
əspɛs #;
baʃ #;
tot #;
pɔk #;
mal #;
əskerp #;
sɛk #;
ɡros #;
koʃ #;
brut #;
nu #;
əɡzaktə #;
suβlim #;
kru #;
frənses #;
kəzat #;
rɔt͡ʃ #;
orp #;
sek #;
ɡrok #;
kandit #;
prəsis #;
ɡris #;
bwit #;
bot͡ʃ #;
ʎark #;
fəʃuk #;
puruk #;
frɛt #;
dropu #;
flɔɲd͡ʒu #;
səɣu #;
səɣəðo #;
sa #;
bo #;
du #;
kla #;
əlβi #;
pla #;
sərɛ #;
al #;
fɔr #;
sor #;
san #;
prufun #;
kur #;
bɛr #;
kəlɛn #;
fəkun #;
dulen #;
blaŋ #;
